Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4067.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1.1. Section 16-583, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE16-583. Voter not on precinct register; inactive voter list; procedure A. On or before election day, the county recorder shall provide to each precinct the names of electors on the inactive voter list by way of a precinct register, a signature ROSTER or an electronic pollbook. If a person whose name is not on the precinct register appears at a polling place or other voting location, an election official shall determine whether the person is on the inactive voter list. If the person is on the inactive voter list, the registrant, on affirmation by the registrant before an election official at the polling place or other voting location that the registrant continues to reside at the address indicated on the inactive voter list, shall be permitted allowed to vote at that polling place or other voting location. The elector's name shall be entered on a separate signature roster page at the end of the signature roster, and voters' names shall be numbered consecutively. If the registrant is at a polling place and the REGISTRANT indicates that the registrant lives at a new residence, the election official shall direct the registrant to the polling place for the new address. B. In addition to listing the inactive voters on or with the precinct register, signature roster or electronic pollbook, the county recorder may include the following information in or with the precinct register, signature roster or electronic pollbook for each voter whose registration status is as follows: 1. "Not registered" status for a registrant who submitted a state voter registration form without satisfactory evidence of citizenship, the county recorder has not found satisfactory evidence of citizenship for that registrant through governmental databases and the county recorder has mailed a notice to that registrant that informs the registrant that satisfactory evidence of citizenship is required for registration. 2. "Suspense" status for a registrant: (a) Who submitted a voter registration form that was incomplete for reasons other than the failure to provide satisfactory evidence of citizenship or who submitted a voter registration form with an invalid residence address. In either case, the registrant did not timely respond to the county recorder's request for information. (b) Who is not currently eighteen years of age but who will be eighteen years of age by the next general election. This registrant will be moved to active status on the registrant's eighteenth birthday. 3. "Not eligible" status for a registrant: (a) Who will not be eighteen years of age before the next general election and who is therefore ineligible to be registered to vote. (b) Who has a nonoperating identification license or a citizenship or immigration number that indicates noncitizenship, to whom the county recorder mailed a notice informing the registrant that satisfactory evidence of citizenship is needed to complete the registration and the county recorder is waiting for a response. 4. "Canceled" status for a registrant who: (a) Died. (b) Is convicted of a felony and the registrant's civil rights are not restored. (c) Is declared incapacitated. (d) Moves out of the jurisdiction. (e) Self-reported as a noncitizen or nonresident of the jurisdiction on a jury duty questionnaire. (f) Requested cancellation. (g) Is on inactive status for a period of four years or through the date of the second general election for federal office as prescribed by section 16-166. B. C. Following the election, the county recorder shall remove from inactive status all electors who voted pursuant to subsection A of this section, shall place the electors' names back on the general register and shall return the electors' status to active. END_STATUTE